District of Columbia statutes.
2-1204.11d

Motion picture and television production permits.

(a)

The Mayor may issue a permit for the occupation of the public space for motion picture, television, and other media productions (“film permit”) pursuant to § 10-1141.03.

(b)

The Mayor may impose a one-time fee for processing of the film permit application in the amount of $30 per production.

(c)

The film permit fee shall be $150 per day per location to occupy public space or a public right-of-way.

(d)

The Mayor may periodically revise the schedule of fees by rulemaking.

(e)

The fees received by the Mayor from applications for and issuance of the film permits shall be deposited into the special account established by § 2-1204.11e.

(f)

No permit may be transferred from one location to another.

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-290, § 2d
as added Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2071(b), 57 DCR 181
This section is referenced in § 2-1204.11e.
2001 Ed., § 39-501.04.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2071(b) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2071(b) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).